Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-2226
Area agency on aging; malfeasance; effect.

In the event of a documented malfeasance on the part of any area agency on aging in the administration of its area plan, and the failure of the governing unit of the area agency to take corrective action within a reasonable time, the department shall, with the advice of the council, terminate funding to the area agency governing unit by disapproving the area plan for that area agency on aging.

Laws 1982, LB 404, § 26;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 874;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 765;

Laws 2026, LB867, § 29.
July 18, 2026